Missouri, session 2026, SB920.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 442.700, to read as
follows:
442.700. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Business entity", any for-profit association,
company, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability
partnership or other legal entity including private equity
firms or hedge funds, and that entity's corporate affiliates
or subsidiaries or any related entity that shares common
management or common ownership. The term "business entity"
does not include businesses regulated under state or federal
banking or finance laws operating as commercial banks, bank
holding companies, savings banks, trust companies, savings
and loan associations, credit unions, mortgage lenders,
mortgage servicers or the subsidiaries or corporate
affiliates of any of the foregoing, excluding private equity
firms;
(2) (a) "Investment entity", any of the following:

SB 920 2
a. A real estate investment trust as defined by any
state or federal statute;
b. An entity that manages funds pooled from investors
and owes a fiduciary duty to those investors. Two or more
investment entities under common management shall be
aggregated and treated as one for purposes of this section;
and
c. The corporate affiliates or subsidiaries or any
related entity that shares common management or common
ownership with an entity listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subdivision.
(b) The term "investment entity" does not include
businesses regulated under state or federal banking or
finance laws operating as commercial banks, bank holding
companies, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, mortgage lenders, mortgage
servicers or the subsidiaries or corporate affiliates of any
of the foregoing, excluding private equity firms;
(3) "Residential property", includes any improved
property that is primarily intended to be used for human
habitation and includes existing structures containing
single-family homes and buildings with at least two but not
more than four units where each unit is primarily intended
to be used for human habitation by an individual or family
which are not intended to be demolished as part of a new
residential development;
(4) "Ownership interest", does not include:
a. Any security interest, including under a deed of
trust or mortgage; or
b. Ownership or any other interest obtained through
foreclosure of a security interest.

SB 920 3
2. A business entity or investment entity that has an
ownership interest in more than fifty single-family
residential properties or more than one hundred residential
units in this state may not purchase, acquire, or otherwise
obtain an interest in another or additional residential
properties in this state.
3. A business or investment entity is not subject to
the prohibitions in this section if the entity is:
(1) The purchaser of an existing residential property
that has failed and is in violation of a building code or
occupancy permit inspection and the purchasers are making
modifications to the property that are necessary to achieve
substantial compliance with existing building or occupancy
codes; or
(2) A person acquiring an ownership interest in
residential property through the construction of new
properties.
4. A seller of a residential property shall not be
liable for any violation of this section.
5. (1) The attorney general may bring a cause of
action in any circuit court with proper jurisdiction if the
attorney general has reason to believe that a business
entity or investment entity or any affiliate or subsidiary
thereof has acquired, directly or indirectly, any
residential real estate in this state on or after August 28,
2026. If the court finds that residential real estate has
been acquired in violation of this section, the court shall
order the sale of the residential real estate not later than
ninety days after the order.
(2) The Missouri housing development commission or non-
profit corporation established by the commission may advise
or report to the attorney general regarding any

SB 920 4
circumstances where the availability and supply of low and
moderate residential housing has been adversely affected by
the activities of a business entity or investment entity
described in this section.
6. Every person who violates the terms of any
injunction issued regarding enforcement of this section
shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty to the state of
Missouri of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars
plus costs incurred by the attorney general enforcing this
section or injunction issued under this section.
7. For the purpose of this section the circuit court
issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the
cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney
general acting in the name of the state may petition for the
recovery of civil penalties.
8. By December 31, 2030, and every five years
thereafter, the office of the attorney general shall
evaluate the efficacy of the maximum civil penalty amount
established in this section in deterring violations of this
section and the difference, if any, between the current
100 penalty amount and the penalty amounts adjusted for
101 inflation and provide the general assembly with a report of
102 its finding and any recommendations.
103 9. This section shall not apply to residential
104 property developers or home builders who acquire real estate
105 for the development and construction of new residential
106 homes including, but not limited to, condominiums, town
107 homes, single-family or multi-family homes.
✓